nouns_formation.lexd
PATTERNS
Noun ([>:>] [<comit>:лалъи])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
NounObl [>:>] (CaseMarker | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker [>:>] SpatialCase)) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

NounOblM [>:>] [<obl><m>:щ] [>:>] [<erg>:ти] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
NounOblM [>:>] [<obl><m>:щу] ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
NounOblM [>:>] [<obl><m>:щу] [>:>] (CaseMarker[-erg,-gen] | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker[-erg,-gen] [>:>] SpatialCase)) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

NounOblF [>:>] [<obl><f>:т] [>:>] [<erg>:ти] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
NounOblF [>:>] [<obl><f>:лълъи] [>:>] (CaseMarker[-erg] | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker[-erg] [>:>] SpatialCase)) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

NounOblHPl ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
NounOblHPl [>:>] (CaseMarker[-gen] | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker[-gen] [>:>] SpatialCase)) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

PATTERN SpatialCase
LocMarker ([<ess>:] | [<lat>:])
LocMarker[-cont] [>:>] DirMarker
LocMarker[cont] [>:>] DirMarker[-al,-trans]

LEXICON LocMarker
<sup>:ла
<cont>:чIу[cont]
<in>:о
<inter>:лIи
<apud>:ха
<ad>:хъи
<place>:алда

LEXICON DirMarker
<elat>:ру
<allat>:ху[al]
<translat>:руху[trans]
<translat>:риди[trans]
<translat>:руди[trans]
<translat>:рикьи[trans]

LEXICON CaseMarker
<erg>:ди[erg]
<gen>:лIи[gen]
<dat>:лъи
<aff>:ра
